Hawaii statutes.
[§52D-5] Powers of chief of police outside
own county. The chief of police of each county and any duly authorized
subordinates shall have and may exercise all powers, privileges, and authority
necessary to enforce the laws of the State, in a county other than the county
in and for which the chief has been appointed, if:

(1) The exercise of such power, privilege, and
authority is required in the pursuit of any investigation commenced within the
county in and for which the chief has been appointed; and

(2) The concurrence of the chief of police of the
county in which the power, privilege, and authority sought to be exercised is
obtained. [L 1989, c 136, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next